Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5251YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2100 Section 1. Section 1.18, subsection 5, paragraph i, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 i. Any oral or written communications, examinations, or 3 publications , other than examinations for a commercial driverâs 4 license, produced or utilized by a driverâs license station, 5 provided public safety is not jeopardized. 6 Sec. 2. Section 321.187, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 1. The department shall examine applicants for driverâs 9 licenses. The department, a third-party test examiner, or a 10 third-party tester shall not use a language other than English 11 to examine an applicant for a commercial driverâs license. 12 Examiners of the department shall wear an identifying badge and 13 uniform provided by the department. 14